Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5149YH (6) 91 da/js H.F. 2167 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 466B.31 Definitions. 1 1. âBuffer stripâ means permanent vegetation that is 2 established and managed adjacent to a waterway to reduce 3 soil erosion and sediment loss, manage nutrients and reduce 4 contributing contaminant loads to receiving surface waters, and 5 improve surface water quality. 6 2. âDivisionâ means the division of soil conservation and 7 water quality created within the department of agriculture and 8 land stewardship pursuant to section 159.5. 9 3. âWaterwayâ means a river, stream, creek, brook, drainage 10 ditch, or other perennially flowing body of water. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 466B.32 Rulemaking. 12 The division shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 13 as it determines necessary or desirable to administer this 14 subchapter. 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 466B.33 Buffer strip program. 16 1. The division shall establish and administer a buffer 17 strip program on a statewide basis. 18 2. In administering the program, the division shall enter 19 into agreements with landowners to establish and maintain 20 buffer strips on land enrolled in the program according to 21 criteria established by the division. The criteria may include 22 but is not limited to any of the following: 23 a. The size of the enrolled land. 24 b. The period in which the buffer strip is required to be 25 maintained. 26 c. The current use of the enrolled land. 27 d. The extent to which a landowner incorporates 28 complementary soil and water conservation practices on the 29 enrolled land. 30 e. The extent to which the landowner advertises the 31 landownerâs participation in the program. 32 3. The department shall design a sign for display by 33 landowners participating in the program. The sign, when posted 34 on the landownerâs land, shall clearly notify the traveling 35 -1- LSB 5149YH (6) 91 da/js 1/ 4 H.F. 2167 public that the landownerâs land is enrolled in the program for 1 purposes of restoring and enhancing water quality. 2 4. The program shall be financed on a cost-share basis 3 in which the division and the landowner contribute to the 4 establishment of the buffer strip. The amount contributed by 5 the division may account for the reduction of income incurred 6 by a landowner in the year that the land was enrolled. 7 5. The division may administer the program in conjunction 8 with the in-field infrastructure program created in section 9 466B.43. 10 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 466B.34 Buffer strip program fund. 11 1. A buffer strip program fund is created in the state 12 treasury under the management and control of the division. 13 2. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to or 14 deposited in the fund. The fund may include other moneys 15 available to and obtained or accepted by the division, 16 including moneys from public or private sources. 17 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the division and 18 shall be used exclusively to carry out the provisions of this 19 subchapter as determined by the division, and shall not require 20 further special authorization by the general assembly. 21 4. a. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 22 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 23 fund. 24 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 25 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a 26 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 27 expenditure for the purposes designated. 28 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 466B.35 Appropriation. 29 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 30 June 30, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, there 31 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 32 department of agriculture and land stewardship for deposit 33 in the buffer strip program fund the amount of five million 34 dollars. 35 -2- LSB 5149YH (6) 91 da/js 2/ 4 H.F. 2167 Sec. 6. Section 466B.43, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 4. a. An in-field infrastructure program is created. The 3 program shall support projects located on agricultural land, 4 which may include demonstration projects, that decrease erosion 5 and precipitation-induced surface runoff, increase water 6 infiltration rates, and increase soil sustainability. The 7 programâs projects shall be limited to infrastructure designed 8 and installed for use over multiple years, including but not 9 limited to structures, terraces, and waterways located on 10 cropland or pastureland, and including but not limited to soil 11 conservation or erosion control structures or managed drainage 12 systems. The program shall be financed on a cost-share basis. 13 b. The division may administer the program in conjunction 14 with the buffer strip program provided in subchapter III. 15